New York, session 2025-2026, A11308.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 28, subdivision 5 of section 34, subdivisions 1, 2, 2 3 and 5 of section 177, subdivision 5 of section 216, and subdivisions 3 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8 of section 300 of the multiple dwelling law are 4 REPEALED. 5 § 2. Subdivision 11 of section 3 of the multiple dwelling law, as 6 amended by chapter 806 of the laws of 1972, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the following 9 enumerated articles, sections and subdivisions of sections of this chap- 10 ter shall not apply to the construction or alteration of multiple dwell- 11 ings for which an application for a permit is made to the department 12 after December sixth, nineteen hundred sixty-nine in a city having a 13 population of one million or more [which adopts or has adopted local 14 laws, ordinances, resolutions or regulations providing protection from 15 fire hazards and making provision for escape from fire in the 16 construction and alteration of multiple dwellings and in other respects 17 as protective as local law seventy-six of the laws of the city of New 18 York for nineteen hundred sixty-eight and covering the same subject 19 matter as the following]: subdivisions twenty-five, twenty-seven, [twen- 20 ty-eight, thirty-five-c,] thirty-six and thirty-nine of section four, 21 subdivision three of section twenty-eight, sections thirty-six, thirty- 22 seven, fifty, fifty-one, fifty-two, fifty-three, fifty-five, sixty, 23 sixty-one, sixty-seven, subdivisions one, two, four and five of section 24 seventy-five, article four, article five, article five-A, and article 25 six [and article seven-B]; except that after December sixth, nineteen 26 hundred sixty-nine where a multiple dwelling erected prior to December EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15704-02-6 A. 11308 2 1 sixth, nineteen hundred sixty-nine is altered, or a building erected 2 prior to December sixth, nineteen hundred sixty-nine is converted to a 3 multiple dwelling pursuant to a permit applied for to the department 4 having jurisdiction, the foregoing articles, sections and subdivisions 5 of sections shall remain applicable where a local law of such city 6 authorizes such alteration or conversion to be made, at the option of 7 the owner, either in accordance with the requirements of the building 8 law and regulations in effect in such city prior to December sixth, 9 nineteen hundred sixty-eight or the requirements of the building law and 10 regulations in effect after such date, and the owner elects to comply 11 with the requirements of the building law and regulations in effect 12 prior to December sixth, nineteen hundred sixty-eight. 13 § 3. Paragraph b of subdivision 1 of section 26 of the multiple dwell- 14 ing law, as amended by chapter 630 of the laws of 1965, is amended to 15 read as follows: 16 b. The construction, enlargement, conversion or alteration of any 17 dwelling undertaken pursuant to plans filed prior to December fifteenth, 18 nineteen hundred sixty-one in compliance with the provisions of sections 19 twenty-six[,] and twenty-seven [and twenty-eight] of this chapter, as 20 they existed prior to the enactment of chapter ten hundred seventy-two 21 of the laws of nineteen hundred sixty, effective July first, nineteen 22 hundred sixty-one may be commenced, continued or completed as if such 23 sections remained in full force and effect. Notwithstanding the 24 provisions of [subdivision four of] section three hundred, the depart- 25 ment shall not require any change or modification in the height or bulk 26 or in the area of yards, courts and other open spaces of dwellings to be 27 erected or enlarged pursuant to plans filed prior to December fifteenth, 28 nineteen hundred sixty-one as a condition for the reissuance of a build- 29 ing permit or the renewal of an approval, except as may otherwise be 30 provided by local law, ordinance or zoning ordinance. 31 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 30 of the multiple dwelling law is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 2. Except as in this section and in sections thirty-three, seventy- 34 six, one hundred fifteen, one hundred sixty, one hundred seventy-six, 35 two hundred, two hundred thirteen, two hundred fifty and two hundred 36 fifty-one or otherwise expressly provided, every room, including kitch- 37 ens, water-closet compartments and bathrooms, shall have at least one 38 window opening directly upon a street or upon a lawful yard, court or 39 space above a setback upon the same lot as that occupied by the multiple 40 dwelling in which such room is situated. Every such window shall be so 41 located as to light properly all portions of the room. 42 § 5. Paragraph a of subdivision 6 of section 34 of the multiple dwell- 43 ing law, as amended by chapter 919 of the laws of 1957, is amended to 44 read as follows: 45 a. Such apartment has at least one half of its height and all of its 46 window surfaces above every part of an "adequate adjacent space." Such 47 "adequate adjacent space" shall be open to the sky, shall be properly 48 drained to the satisfaction of the department, and shall be a continuous 49 surface area outside the dwelling not less than thirty feet in its least 50 dimension and abutting at same level, or directly below, every part of 51 the exterior walls of such apartment and of every other apartment on the 52 same floor. Such "adequate adjacent space" shall include only space 53 which is located on the same lot or plot as the dwelling or on a street 54 or public place or space. For buildings not more than seventy-five feet 55 in height and when an "adequate adjacent space" of thirty feet cannot be A. 11308 3 1 provided, an open space at least twenty feet in its least dimension 2 shall be provided along the entire width of the building. 3 § 6. Section 54 of the multiple dwelling law is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 § 54. Cellar entrance. 1. There shall be a direct entrance to the 6 cellar, or to the lowest story if there be no cellar, from the outside 7 of every multiple dwelling erected after April eighteenth, nineteen 8 hundred twenty-nine, except that in non-fireproof multiple dwellings 9 erected after such date which are three stories or less in height and 10 occupied by not more than two families on any story, any stair leading 11 to such cellar or lowest story may be located inside the dwelling 12 provided it is enclosed in fireproof walls and fireproof doors and 13 assemblies with the doors self-closing, at both the level of such cellar 14 or lowest story and that of the story above. No such outside entrance 15 existing in any multiple dwelling on April eighteenth, nineteen hundred 16 twenty-nine, shall be obstructed. 17 2. The requirements and standards prescribed in this section shall be 18 subject to variation in specific cases by the commissioner of the 19 department or the board of standards and appeals of such city, in 20 accordance with paragraph two of subdivision (b) of section six hundred 21 forty-five and section six hundred sixty-six of the New York city char- 22 ter. 23 § 7. Paragraph b of subdivision 2 of section 76 of the multiple dwell- 24 ing law, as added by chapter 969 of the laws of 1960, is amended to read 25 as follows: 26 b. Every apartment in a class A dwelling, except old-law tenements, 27 shall also contain a bath or shower, which may be in a separate compart- 28 ment or together with the water-closet in a bathroom. There shall be 29 access to at least one such compartment or bathroom from every bedroom 30 without passing through any other bedroom. 31 § 8. Section 161 of the multiple dwelling law, as added by chapter 562 32 of the laws of 1954, is amended to read as follows: 33 § 161. Application of article five-A. The provisions of this article 34 shall apply to garden-type maisonette dwelling projects erected under 35 plans filed with the department on or after April eighteenth, nineteen 36 hundred fifty-four. They shall apply to all such dwellings unless their 37 application is expressly limited to dwellings of a particular class. 38 They shall apply in addition to, and not in substitution for, the 39 provisions of article three. Such dwellings need not comply with the 40 provisions of sections [twenty-eight,] thirty-five, thirty-six, fifty, 41 fifty-four, and sixty-five, or with articles four, five, six or seven of 42 this chapter, but such dwellings shall comply with all of the provisions 43 of the building code applicable to residential buildings of this type 44 and kind. A garden-type maisonette dwelling project, which is erected in 45 accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter for fireproof 46 or non-fireproof dwellings other than the provisions of this article 47 five-A, shall not be required to comply with the provisions of this 48 article. 49 § 9. Section 174 of the multiple dwelling law is amended to read as 50 follows: 51 § 174. Size of rooms. Every living room shall contain five hundred 52 fifty cubic feet or more of air, shall be at least six feet wide at its 53 narrowest part and shall have a minimum height of seven feet if such 54 room is in the basement, of seven feet at all points more than six feet 55 from the front of such room if it is on the top story, and of eight feet 56 if on any other story, except that whenever a basement conforms to the A. 11308 4 1 provisions of [subdivision four of] section one hundred seventy-seven 2 the living rooms in such basement may have a minimum height of six feet 3 eight inches from the finished floor to the bottom of any beams project- 4 ing below the level of the finished basement ceiling and of seven feet 5 to the ceiling between such beams. 6 § 10. Subdivision 4 of section 177 of the multiple dwelling law, para- 7 graph (g) as added by chapter 309 of the laws of 1965, is amended to 8 read as follows: 9 [4.] The basement of a converted dwelling may be used for living 10 purposes without meeting the requirements of subdivisions one and two of 11 section one hundred seventy-three if such dwelling meets the other 12 applicable requirements of such section and of this chapter, including 13 the following: 14 [a.] 1. Such a dwelling shall not exceed three stories, including the 15 basement, in height. 16 [b.] 2. It shall be occupied by not more than one family on any story, 17 including the basement. For the purposes of this [subdivision] section a 18 family shall not be deemed to include any boarders, lodgers or roomers. 19 [c.] 3. It shall have at least one court two feet or more in width 20 extending across the entire depth of the lot from the street to the 21 yard. 22 [d.] 4. The department shall deem the basement to be adequately light- 23 ed and ventilated, free of any dampness, sanitary and habitable. 24 [e.] 5. There shall be a separate water-closet compartment within the 25 basement apartment conforming to the provisions of section two hundred. 26 [f.] 6. Such dwelling shall not be required to comply with section one 27 hundred eighty-seven if a scuttle is provided conforming to section one 28 hundred eighty-eight. 29 [(g)] 7. This subdivision is applicable only to buildings noted, clas- 30 sified or recorded as such converted dwellings in the department prior 31 to January first, nineteen hundred sixty-six. 32 § 11. Paragraphs a and h of subdivision 1 of section 187 of the multi- 33 ple dwelling law are amended to read as follows: 34 a. If a dwelling is two stories or less in height, or if it is three 35 stories including a basement in height and conforms to the conditions of 36 [subdivision four of] section one hundred seventy-seven, a single means 37 of egress from each story to the street shall be sufficient. 38 h. Where a required means of egress leads to a yard less than thirty 39 feet in depth, except as provided in [paragraph f of] subdivision [four] 40 six of section one hundred seventy-seven, there shall be access from 41 such yard to the street through a court or fireproof passage, or to the 42 yard or court of adjoining premises by a gate or door through an inter- 43 vening fence, or, if the department deems such gate or door impractica- 44 ble and so certifies, by a ladder to the top of an intervening fence or 45 wall or by such other means as the department may require. 46 § 12. Paragraph a of subdivision 10 of section 248 of the multiple 47 dwelling law, as amended by chapter 839 of the laws of 1965, is amended 48 to read as follows: 49 a. There shall be a [central] permanent heating system adequate to 50 heat every sleeping room in a dwelling to the temperature requirements 51 prescribed by subdivision one of section seventy-nine of this chapter. 52 § 13. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 277 of the multiple 53 dwelling law, as added by chapter 734 of the laws of 1985, is amended to 54 read as follows: 55 (b) Window openings in exterior walls shall conform with the limita- 56 tions [of table 3-4 chapter twenty-six of the administrative code of the A. 11308 5 1 city of] described in the New York city construction codes, unless such 2 windows are fire protected and provided with either a minimum of one 3 sprinkler head per window or window automatic closing devices, accepta- 4 ble to the department of buildings. 5 § 14. Paragraphs (b) and (c) of subdivision 2 of section 277 of the 6 multiple dwelling law, as added by chapter 734 of the laws of 1985, are 7 amended to read as follows: 8 (b) if non-fireproof, does not exceed a height of six stories, and 9 eighty-five feet measured to the ceiling of the highest floor in a depth 10 of one hundred feet; or does not exceed a height of seven stories, and 11 eighty-five feet and a depth of one hundred feet and is wet sprinklered 12 throughout; and has a maximum floor area between the two hour rated 13 [partitions] wall assemblies constructed in accordance with [section 14 C26-504.2 of the administrative code of the city of] the New York city 15 construction codes of: 16 (i) three thousand square feet; or 17 (ii) five thousand square feet if the building is six stories or less 18 in height and is fully wet sprinklered; or 19 (iii) five thousand square feet if the building is seven stories in 20 height and is fully wet sprinklered and has a stand pipe system; or 21 (iv) ten thousand square feet if the building is fully wet sprinklered 22 and has one hour rated ceilings. 23 (c) complies with the applicable construction classification require- 24 ments and exterior wall opening limitations of [table 3-4 chapter twen- 25 ty-six of the administrative code of the city of] the New York [for J-2 26 occupancy] city construction codes. 27 § 15. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 of section 277 of the multiple 28 dwelling law, as added by chapter 734 of the laws of 1985, is amended to 29 read as follows: 30 (b) complies with the standards of lighting, ventilation, size of 31 rooms, alcoves and balconies contained in [section C26-1205.0 through 32 and including sections C26-1205.5 and C26-1205.7 of the administrative 33 code of the city of] the New York city construction codes, except as 34 otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of subdivision seven of this 35 section. 36 § 16. Subdivision 7 of section 277 of the multiple dwelling law, as 37 added by chapter 734 of the laws of 1985, paragraph (e) as amended by 38 chapter 559 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 39 7. Minimum light and air standards for joint living-work quarters for 40 artists or general residential portions of lofts or manufacturing and 41 commercial buildings altered to residential use shall comply with the 42 following: 43 (a) Portions of such buildings which are occupied exclusively as joint 44 living-work quarters for artists as permitted by local law shall comply 45 with the following: 46 (i) The minimum size of a joint living-work quarters for artists shall 47 be twelve hundred square feet of interior space, except as otherwise 48 authorized by the zoning resolution of the city of New York, for units 49 occupied for residential purposes on or before January first, nineteen 50 hundred eighty-five. 51 (ii) Joint living-work quarters for artists shall conform to the stan- 52 dards for light and ventilation of [sections C26-1205.0 through and 53 including section C26-1205.7 of the administrative code of the city of] 54 the New York city construction codes. 55 (b) Portions of such buildings which are occupied exclusively as resi- 56 dential units as permitted by local law shall comply with the following: A. 11308 6 1 (i) Every dwelling unit shall have one or more windows: 2 A. which open onto a street, a court with a dimension of fifteen feet 3 perpendicular to the windows and one hundred square feet minimum area 4 above a setback or a [thirty] twenty foot rear yard; or 5 B. for corner lots or lots within one hundred feet of a corner, where 6 the minimum horizontal distance between such windows opening onto a rear 7 yard and the rear lot line is at least twenty feet; or 8 C. for interior lots, where the minimum horizontal distance between 9 such windows opening onto a rear yard and any wall opposite such windows 10 on the same or another zoning lot is at least twenty feet and not less 11 than a distance equal to one-third of the total height of such wall 12 above the sill height of such windows; but need not exceed forty feet; 13 or 14 D. for interior lots where the minimum horizontal distance between 15 such windows opening onto a rear yard and any wall opposite such windows 16 on the same or another zoning lot is at least fifteen feet and the mini- 17 mum size of such dwelling unit is twelve hundred square feet; [or] and 18 E. in no event shall the distance between such windows and the rear 19 lot line be less than five feet; and 20 F. yards and courts may be existing or may be new in buildings seven 21 stories or less in height. 22 (ii) The minimum required ratio of window area opening onto a street, 23 rear yard, or court to the floor area of every living room shall: 24 A. be ten percent where the floor area of such living room is less 25 than five hundred square feet; or 26 B. decrease, by one percent for every one hundred square feet greater 27 than five hundred square feet of floor area of such living room, to a 28 minimum of five percent; and 29 C. in no event shall the distance between such window area and the 30 rear lot line be less than five feet; and 31 D. at least fifty percent of the required window area shall be opena- 32 ble. 33 (c) Ventilation of spaces other than living rooms, including enclosed 34 work spaces for joint living-work quarters for artists shall be either 35 in accordance with this section or in accordance with the administrative 36 code of the city of New York. 37 (d) No building converted pursuant to this article shall be enlarged, 38 except where the underlying zoning district permits residential use. 39 Such an enlargement shall be in conformance with the bulk regulations 40 for conforming residential use for new construction and shall be in 41 conformance with the provisions of section twenty-six of this chapter. 42 No interior floor area enlargement shall be permitted except that a 43 mezzanine with a minimum headroom of seven feet shall be allowed within 44 individual dwelling units, provided that the gross floor area of such 45 mezzanine does not exceed one-third of the floor area contained within 46 such dwelling unit. No mezzanine shall be included as floor area for the 47 purpose of calculating the minimum required size of a living room or a 48 dwelling unit or for calculating floor area devoted to dwellings. For 49 the purpose of this article a mezzanine may be constructed above the 50 level of the roof of a building as long as the aggregate area of roof 51 structures does not exceed one-third of the total roof area and the roof 52 structures conform with applicable building code requirements. 53 (e) The kitchen located within dwelling units and having a floor area 54 of eighty square feet or more shall have natural ventilation as 55 prescribed in [sections 27-749 and 27-750 of chapter twenty-seven of the 56 administrative code of the city of] the New York city construction A. 11308 7 1 codes. Open kitchens shall be considered as part of the adjacent space 2 where forty percent of the area of the separation between the spaces is 3 open and without doors. If the floor area of the combined space exceeds 4 seven hundred fifty square feet, a separate bedroom shall not be 5 required. When the floor area is less than eighty square feet the kitch- 6 enette shall be ventilated by either of the following: 7 (i) Natural means complying with [sections 27-749 and 27-750 of chap- 8 ter twenty-seven of the administrative code of the city of] the New York 9 city construction codes and further that the windows shall have a mini- 10 mum width of twelve inches, a minimum area of three square feet, or ten 11 percent of the floor area of the space, whichever is greater and be so 12 constructed that at least one-half of their required area may be opened. 13 When the space is located at the top story, the window or windows may be 14 replaced with a skylight whose minimum width shall be twelve inches, 15 whose minimum area shall be four square feet or one-eighth of the floor 16 area of the space, whichever is greater and which shall have ventilation 17 openings of at least one-half of the required area of the skylight. 18 (ii) Mechanical means exhausting at least two cubic feet per minute of 19 air per square foot of floor area. Where doors are to be used to sepa- 20 rate the space, the lower portion of each door shall have a metal grill 21 containing at least forty-eight square inches of clean openings or in 22 lieu of such grill, two clear opening spaces may be provided, each of at 23 least twenty-four square inches, one between the bottom of each door and 24 the floor and the other between the top of each door and the head jamb. 25 (f) When bathrooms and toilet rooms are ventilated by natural means, 26 the natural ventilation sources shall comply with [sub-article 1205.0 of 27 chapter twenty-six of the administrative code of the city of] the New 28 York city construction codes and shall have an unobstructed free area of 29 at least five percent of the floor area. In no case shall the net free 30 area of the ventilation sources be less than one and one-half square 31 feet. When bathrooms and toilet rooms are vented by mechanical means, 32 individual vent shafts or ducts constructed of non-combustible materials 33 with a minimum cross section area of one square foot shall be utilized, 34 the exhaust system shall be capable of exhausting at least fifty cubic 35 feet per minute of air. Means shall be provided for egress of air by 36 louvers in doors, by undercutting the door, or by transfer ducts, grills 37 or other openings. Toilet exhaust systems shall be arranged to expel air 38 directly to the outdoors. 39 (g) A single station smoke detector shall be installed immediately 40 outside each sleeping or bedroom area of each dwelling unit. Such device 41 shall be designed and installed so as to detect smoke and activate an 42 alarm, be reasonably free from false alarms and provide visible indi- 43 cation that the alarm is energized. Such device shall be directly 44 connected to the lighting circuit of the dwelling or rooming unit with 45 no intervening wall switch and shall provide a warning signal clearly 46 audible in all sleeping quarters with intervening doors closed. Cord 47 connected installations or smoke detectors which rely exclusively on 48 batteries are not permissible. Such devices shall either be approved or 49 listed by an acceptable testing service or laboratory. 50 § 17. Subdivision 1 of section 300 of the multiple dwelling law, para- 51 graph a as amended by chapter 411 of the laws of 1949, is amended to 52 read as follows: 53 [1.] It shall be unlawful to commence the construction or alteration 54 of a multiple dwelling or any part or section thereof, or of any build- 55 ing or structure on the same lot with such a dwelling, or the alteration 56 or conversion of a building for use as a multiple dwelling, or the A. 11308 8 1 moving of a dwelling from one lot to another, until the issuance of a 2 permit [by the department upon compliance with all of the following 3 requirements: 4 a. The owner, or a registered architect or licensed professional engi- 5 neer designated by the owner as his agent, shall file with the depart- 6 ment, upon a form furnished by it, a detailed statement of the specifi- 7 cations for the construction, alteration, conversion or moving of such 8 dwelling or structure and for its use and occupancy, together with as 9 many complete copies of the plans of such work as may be required by the 10 department. 11 b. Such statement shall give the name and residence, by street and 12 number, of the owner of such dwelling or structure. If such 13 construction, alteration, conversion or moving is proposed to be done by 14 any other person than the owner of the land in fee, such statement shall 15 also contain the name and residence, by street and number, of every 16 person interested in such land and dwelling, either as owner, as lessee 17 or in any representative capacity. 18 c. Such statement shall be verified by an affidavit of the person 19 making it. Said affidavit shall allege that said specifications and 20 plans are true and contain a correct description of such dwelling or 21 structure, of the class and kind thereof, of its occupancy of the lot 22 and of the proposed work. No architect or engineer shall be recognized 23 as the agent of the owner unless he shall file with the department a 24 written instrument, signed by the owner, designating him as such agent. 25 Any false allegation in respect to a material point shall be deemed 26 perjury. 27 d. Such specifications, plans and statements shall be filed in the 28 department, which shall cause them to be examined. If such plans and 29 specifications conform to the provisions of this chapter, to the build- 30 ing code and regulations, and to all other applicable law, they shall be 31 approved by the department, and a written certificate to that effect 32 shall be issued to the person entitled thereto] in accordance with the 33 New York city construction codes. 34 § 18. Section 301 of the multiple dwelling law, paragraph b of subdi- 35 vision 1 as amended by chapter 893 of the laws of 1968, subdivision 4 as 36 amended by chapter 131 of the laws of 1979, subdivision 6 as added by 37 chapter 406 of the laws of 1992 and subdivision 7 as added by chapter 38 214 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 39 § 301. Certificate of compliance or occupancy. 1. No multiple dwelling 40 shall be occupied in whole or in part until the issuance of a certif- 41 icate by the department that said dwelling conforms in all respects to 42 the requirements of this chapter, to the building code and rules and to 43 all other applicable law[, except that no such certificate shall be 44 required in the case of: 45 a. Any class B multiple dwelling existing on April eighteenth, nine- 46 teen hundred twenty-nine, for which a certificate of occupancy was not 47 required before such date and in which no changes or alterations have 48 been made except in compliance with this chapter, and 49 b. Any old-law tenement, or any class A multiple dwelling erected 50 after April twelfth, nineteen hundred one, which was occupied for two 51 years immediately before January first, nineteen hundred nine, and in 52 which no changes or alterations have been made except in compliance with 53 the tenement house law or this chapter, or wherein: 54 (1) two or more apartments are combined creating larger residential 55 units, and A. 11308 9 1 (2) the total legal number of families within the building is being 2 decreased, and 3 (3) the bulk of the buildings is not being increased 4 These exceptions shall not be deemed to relieve any owner from the 5 obligation to make every alteration required in any old-law tenement or 6 other multiple dwelling in compliance with the applicable provisions of 7 this chapter. 8 2. Except as above provided, no dwelling constructed as or altered or 9 converted into a multiple dwelling after April eighteenth, nineteen 10 hundred twenty-nine, shall be occupied in whole or in part until the 11 issuance of a certificate of compliance or occupancy. 12 3. Such certificate shall be issued within ten days after written 13 application therefor if the dwelling shall be entitled thereto. The 14 department shall, on request of the owner or of his certified agent, 15 issue a certificate of compliance or occupancy for any existing multiple 16 dwelling not requiring such certificate, provided that, after an 17 inspection by the department, no violations are found against such 18 dwelling]. 19 [4.] 2. The head of the department may, on the request of the owner or 20 [his] such owner's certified agent, issue a temporary certificate of 21 compliance or occupancy for a multiple dwelling or a section or a part 22 thereof for a period of ninety days or less, provided that such certif- 23 icate shall bear the endorsement that the dwelling has been inspected by 24 the department and complies with all the requirements of this chapter, 25 and that such temporary occupancy will not jeopardize life, health or 26 property. Such temporary certificate may be renewed at the discretion of 27 the head of the department [for similar periods but shall not extend, 28 together with such renewals, beyond a total period of two years from the 29 date of its original issuance] issued in accordance with the standards 30 prescribed by the New York city charter and administrative code of the 31 city of New York. 32 [5.] 3. A certificate, a record in the department, or a statement 33 signed by the head of the department that a certificate has been issued, 34 may be relied upon by every person who in good faith purchases a multi- 35 ple dwelling or who in good faith lends money upon the security of a 36 mortgage covering such a dwelling. Whenever any person has so relied 37 upon such a certificate, no claim that such dwelling had not, prior to 38 the issuance of such certificate, conformed in all respects to the 39 provisions of this chapter shall be made against such person or against 40 the interest of such person in a multiple dwelling to which such a 41 certificate applies or concerning which such a statement has been 42 issued. 43 [6. Notwithstanding any general or local law to the contrary, a 44 certificate issued for any multiple dwelling organized pursuant to the 45 provisions of article nine-B of the real property law, shall be deemed 46 issued for each dwelling unit contained within such multiple dwelling in 47 full compliance with the requirements of this section. 48 7.] 4. a. Any certificate by the department authorizing occupancy of a 49 dwelling as a Class B hotel shall also authorize occupancy of units in 50 such dwelling for permanent residence purposes notwithstanding any 51 provision of this chapter or of any state law, local law, ordinance, 52 resolution or regulation that would otherwise prohibit such occupancy, 53 require a change or alteration to the dwelling, or require a new or 54 amended certificate, provided that: (1) such occupancy for permanent 55 residence purposes shall be subject to the approval of the local housing 56 agency in its discretion; (2) a portion of such dwelling shall be A. 11308 10 1 located within a district that under the local zoning regulations or 2 ordinances permits residential uses or within four hundred feet of such 3 a district, and such dwelling shall not be located in an industrial 4 business zone established pursuant to chapter six-D of title twenty-two 5 of the administrative code of the city of New York; (3) in the case of a 6 property at which any hotel workers are represented by a collective 7 bargaining representative, prior to the proposed conversion of such 8 property to occupancy for permanent residence purposes, the collective 9 bargaining representative shall be notified in writing of the proposed 10 conversion, and the property owner shall certify prior to the local 11 housing agency approving such occupancy that the collective bargaining 12 representative has mutually agreed in a separate writing with the prop- 13 erty owner to undertake the specific conversion described in the written 14 notice; and (4) such dwelling shall meet the conditions in paragraph b 15 of this subdivision. Alterations to the configuration of any such units 16 shall be permitted and shall comply with any applicable requirements of 17 any state law, local law, ordinance, resolution or regulation relating 18 to Class B hotels. If occupancy for permanent residence purposes is 19 authorized under the provisions of this subdivision within a district 20 where the local zoning regulations or ordinances would not otherwise 21 permit such use, the residential tenants shall be notified of the 22 district's zoning. 23 b. Occupancy of units in a dwelling shall not be authorized under the 24 provisions of paragraph a of this subdivision unless such units are (1) 25 financed by the state pursuant to and in compliance with the provisions 26 of article thirty-one of the private housing finance law; or (2) 27 purchased, acquired, or financed by a local housing agency, for the 28 purpose of creating supportive and/or affordable housing to be operated 29 by an appropriate nonprofit organization pursuant to a regulatory agree- 30 ment or contract with such local agency for low-income households or 31 people experiencing homelessness immediately prior to entering such 32 housing, where tenants shall earn no more than sixty percent of the area 33 median income and all units are rent stabilized and subject to permanent 34 affordability restrictions. For purposes of this paragraph, "appropriate 35 nonprofit organization", "affordable housing", "experiencing homeless- 36 ness", "rent stabilized", and "permanent affordability restrictions" 37 shall have the same meaning as defined in article thirty-one of the 38 private housing finance law. 39 § 19. Section 170 of the multiple dwelling law, as amended by chapter 40 959 of the laws of 1966, is amended to read as follows: 41 § 170. Application of article six and other provisions to converted 42 dwellings. The provisions of this article shall apply to converted 43 dwellings and to such dwellings only. They shall apply to all converted 44 dwellings unless their application is expressly limited to dwellings of 45 a particular class. The following enumerated articles and sections shall 46 also apply to all converted dwellings unless so limited: 47 Article 1. Introductory provisions; definitions. 48 2. Miscellaneous application provisions. 49 7-a. Temporary provisions. 50 8. Requirements and remedies. 51 9. Registry of names and service of papers. 52 10. Prostitution. 53 11. Laws repealed; saving clause; legislative intent; 54 effect. 55 § [28. Two or more buildings on same lot] 56 29. Painting of courts and shafts A. 11308 11 1 31. Size of rooms--subdivision six 2 35. Entrance doors and lights 3 37. Artificial hall lighting 4 52. Stairs 5 55. Wainscoting 6 56. Frame buildings and extensions 7 57. Bells; mail receptacles 8 58. Incombustible materials 9 59. Bakeries and fat boiling 10 [§] 60. Motor vehicle storage 11 61. Business uses 12 62. Parapets, guard railings and wires--subdivision two 13 75. Water supply 14 76. Water-closet and bath accommodations 15 77. Plumbing and drainage 16 78. Repairs 17 79. Heating 18 80. Cleanliness 19 81. Receptacles for waste matter 20 83. Janitor or housekeeper 21 § 20. Section 210 of the multiple dwelling law, as amended by chapter 22 959 of the laws of 1966, is amended to read as follows: 23 § 210. Application of article seven and other provisions to tenements. 24 Except as provided in section two hundred forty-eight, the provisions of 25 this article shall apply only to tenements, as defined in subdivision 26 eleven of section four, occupied as such before April eighteenth, nine- 27 teen hundred twenty-nine. Unless in this article otherwise specifically 28 prescribed, none of its provisions shall be deemed to require any struc- 29 tural alteration in any tenement erected after April eleventh, nineteen 30 hundred one and lawfully occupied as such on April eighteenth, nineteen 31 hundred twenty-nine. Nothing in this article shall apply to converted 32 dwellings. In addition to the provisions of this article, the following 33 enumerated articles and sections shall, to the extent required therein, 34 apply to tenements: 35 Article 1. Introductory provisions; definitions 36 2. Miscellaneous application provisions 37 7-a. Temporary provisions 38 8. Requirements and remedies 39 9. Registry of names and service of papers 40 10. Prostitution 41 11. Laws repealed; saving clause; legislative intent; effect 42 § [28. Two or more buildings on same lot] 43 29. Painting of courts and shafts 44 31. Size of rooms--subdivision six 45 33. Cooking spaces 46 34. Rooms in basements and cellars 47 35. Entrance doors and lights 48 37. Artificial hall lighting 49 51. Shafts, elevators and dumbwaiters 50 52. Stairs 51 53. Fire-escapes 52 55. Wainscoting 53 56. Frame buildings and extensions 54 [§] 57. Bells; mail receptacles 55 58. Incombustible materials 56 59. Bakeries and fat boiling A. 11308 12 1 60. Motor vehicle storage 2 61. Business uses 3 62. Parapets, guard railings and wires--subdivision two 4 75. Water supply 5 76. Water-closet and bath accommodations 6 77. Plumbing and drainage 7 78. Repairs 8 79. Heating 9 80. Cleanliness 10 81. Receptacles for waste matter 11 83. Janitor or housekeeper 12 § 21. Subdivision 1 of section 278 of the multiple dwelling law, as 13 added by chapter 734 of the laws of 1985, is amended to read as follows: 14 1. The provisions of this article apply to buildings with residential, 15 mixed or joint living-work quarters or artists' occupancy as herein 16 provided and to such buildings only. In addition to the provisions of 17 this article, the following enumerated articles and sections of this 18 chapter shall, to the extent required therein, apply to such buildings: 19 Article 1. Introductory provisions: definitions 20 2. Miscellaneous application provisions except sub- 21 division two of section nine 22 8. Requirements and remedies 23 9. Registry of names and service of papers 24 10. Prostitution 25 11. Laws repealed; saving clause; effect 26 Section [28. Two or more buildings on same lot] 27 29. Painting of courts and shafts 28 31. Size of rooms, subdivision six only 29 37. Artificial hall lighting 30 53. Fire-escapes 31 55. Wainscoting, subdivision two only 32 56. Frame buildings and extensions 33 57. Bells; mail receptacles 34 58. Incombustible materials 35 59. Bakeries and fat boiling 36 60. Motor vehicle storage 37 61. Business uses (except paragraph c of subdivision 38 one and subdivision three) 39 62. Parapets, guard railings and wires 40 § 22. Subdivision c of section 27-2084 of the administrative code of 41 the city of New York is amended to read as follows: 42 c. The basement of a dwelling converted in accordance with the 43 provisions of [subdivision four of] section one hundred seventy-seven of 44 the multiple dwelling law may be occupied only if the dwelling is clas- 45 sified and recorded in the department as such a converted dwelling prior 46 to January first, nineteen hundred sixty-six. 47 § 23. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 48 buildings in existence on or constructed after such date.